Nevada, session 83, AB485.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 532.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
532.210 1. The fund created pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 232, Statutes of Nevada 1931, and chapter 23, Statutes of
Nevada 1943, is hereby continued as a revolving account within the
State General Fund, for the purposes set forth in NRS 533.270 to
533.295, inclusive, and for the purposes set forth in the provisions
of chapters 534, 535 and 536 of NRS pertaining to the conservation
and distribution of waters.
2. [The] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
534.040, the money in the Water Distribution Revolving Account
may be used for:
(a) The payment of state water commissioners’ and assistant
state water commissioners’ salaries and expenses.
(b) The payment of salaries and expenses of other employees
engaged in the work of the distribution of waters or streams that are
directly under the supervision of the State Engineer.
(c) The payment of expenses necessarily incurred by the state
water commissioners in the distribution of water.
3. The money in the Water Distribution Revolving Account, or
so much thereof as is necessary, may be used by the State Engineer
for the uses and purposes of, and in the administration of the
-
*AB485*

– 3 –
provisions of, chapter 534 of NRS pertaining to the conservation
and distribution of underground waters.
Sec. 2. NRS 534.035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534.035 1. In each area designated as a groundwater basin by
the State Engineer pursuant to the provisions of NRS 534.030, the
board of county commissioners may recommend to the State
Engineer that the State Engineer establish a groundwater board. The
State Engineer shall determine whether or not a groundwater board
is to be established and may direct its establishment by order.
2. If a groundwater board is established, the governing bodies
of all the cities and towns within the designated area, the board of
county commissioners of each county in which the area is located,
and the governing body of any water district in which the area is
included, or partly included, shall each submit a list of names of
residents of the area to the Governor, who shall appoint seven
members of the board. At least one member must be appointed from
each list.
3. After the initial terms, the term of office of each member of
the board is 4 years. The board shall elect one member as chair and
one member as secretary to serve as such at the pleasure of the
board.
4. The board shall maintain its headquarters at the county seat
of the county in which the designated area is located, or if the area
lies in more than one county, in the county seat of one of the
counties in which the area is located. The board shall hold meetings
at such times and places as it may determine. Special meetings may
be called at any time by the secretary at the request of any four
members, or by the chair, upon notice specifying the matters to be
acted upon at the meeting. No matters other than those specified in
the notice may be acted upon at that meeting unless all members are
present and consent thereto.
5. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum, and the board
shall act only by a majority of those present.
6. For each day’s attendance at each meeting of the
groundwater board, or for each day when services are actually
performed for the groundwater board, the members are entitled to
receive per diem and travel allowances provided by law. Claims for
those expenses must be paid as provided in subsection [7] 8 of
NRS 534.040.
7. The State Engineer shall not approve any application or
issue any permit to drill a well, appropriate groundwater, change the
place or manner of use or the point of diversion of water within the
designated area, adopt any related regulations or enter any related
orders until the State Engineer has conferred with the board and
obtained its written advice and recommendations.
-
*AB485*

– 4 –
8. It is the intention of the Legislature that the State Engineer
and the board be in agreement whenever possible, but, for the
purpose of fixing responsibility to the Governor, if there is any
disagreement between the State Engineer and the board, the views
of the State Engineer prevail. A written report of any such
disagreement must be made immediately to the Governor by the
State Engineer and the board.
9. Any groundwater board may request from the State Engineer
or any other state, county, city or district agency such technical
information, data and advice as it may require to perform its
functions, and the State Engineer and such other agencies shall,
within the resources available to them, furnish such assistance as
may be requested.
10. The Governor may dissolve the groundwater board by
order if the Governor determines that the future activities of the
board are likely to be insubstantial.
Sec. 3. NRS 534.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534.040 1. Upon the initiation of the administration of this
chapter in any particular basin, and where the investigations of the
State Engineer have shown the necessity for the supervision over the
waters of that basin, the State Engineer may employ a well
supervisor and other necessary assistants, who shall execute the
duties as provided in this chapter under the direction of the State
Engineer. The salaries of the well supervisor and the assistants of
the well supervisor must be fixed by the State Engineer. The well
supervisor and assistants are exempt from the provisions of chapter
284 of NRS.
2. If the money available from the license fees provided for in
NRS 534.140 is not sufficient to pay those salaries, together with
necessary expenses, including the compensation and other expenses
of the Well Drillers’ Advisory Board, the board of county
commissioners shall, except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, levy a special assessment annually, or at such time as the
assessment is needed, upon all taxable property situated within the
confines of the area designated by the State Engineer to come under
the provisions of this chapter in an amount as is necessary to pay
such salaries and expenses. If the board of county commissioners
determines that the amount of a special assessment levied upon a
property owner pursuant to this section when combined with the
amount of all other taxes and assessments levied upon the property
owner is less than the cost of collecting the special assessment
levied pursuant to this subsection, the board of county
commissioners may exempt the property owner from the assessment
and appropriate money from the general fund of the county to pay
the cost of the assessment. Money levied from a special assessment
-
*AB485*

– 5 –
or appropriated from the general fund of a county pursuant to this
section must not be used to pay the salaries and expenses of an
employee subject to the provisions of chapter 284 of NRS.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, in designated
areas within which the use of groundwater is predominantly for
agricultural purposes, any special assessment levied pursuant to this
section must be charged against each water user who has a permit to
appropriate water or a perfected water right, and the charge against
each water user must be based upon the proportion which his or her
water right bears to the aggregate water rights in the designated
area. [The minimum charge is $1.] Except as otherwise provided in
this subsection, the maximum charge is equal to the existing
charge as of June 30, 2025, plus the annual percentage increase
in the Consumer Price Index (All Items) published by the United
States Department of Labor for the immediately preceding year.
The State Engineer may, with the approval of the board of county
commissioners, increase the charge beyond the maximum set forth
in this subsection.
4. The salaries and expenses may be paid by the State Engineer
from the Water Distribution Revolving Account pending the levy
and collection of an assessment levied pursuant to this section.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if a special
assessment is levied pursuant to this section, the proper officers of
the county shall levy and collect the special assessment as other
special assessments are levied and collected, and the assessment is a
lien upon the property.
6. Any special assessment collected pursuant to this section
must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the Water
District Account to be accounted for in basin well accounts.
7. Not more than once each year, the State Engineer shall
provide to a board of county commissioners in this State which
levies a special assessment or appropriates money from the
general fund of the county pursuant to this section, upon written
request from the board of county commissioners, a report on the
expenditures and activities from the Water District Account for the
particular basin well account of that groundwater basin.
8. Upon determination and certification by the State Engineer
of the amount to be budgeted for the current or ensuing fiscal year
for the purpose of paying the per diem and travel allowances of the
groundwater board and employing consultants or other help needed
to fulfill its responsibilities, the State Controller shall transfer that
amount to a separate operating account for that fiscal year for the
groundwater basin. Claims against the account must be approved by
the groundwater board and paid as other claims against the State are
paid. The State Engineer may use money in a particular basin well
-
*AB485*

– 6 –
account to support an activity outside the basin in which the money
is collected if the activity bears a direct relationship to the
responsibilities or activities of the State Engineer regarding the
particular groundwater basin.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Water Resources of the State
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources the sum of
$1,000,000 for:
(a) Costs associated with updates to the water budgets of the
groundwater basins in this State;
(b) The collection of data and the monitoring of water resources
and ecosystems in this State;
(c) The digitization of records and data of the Division; and
(d) Hiring staff for the adjudication of vested water rights in the
groundwater basins in this State.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB485*